en: Powdered cappucino, Instant powder for cappuccino
de: Cappuccinopulver
es: Cappucino en polvo
fi: Cappuccino-pikakahvit
fr: Cappuccino en poudre, Cappuccino en poudre soluble
hr: Cappuccino u prahu, Cappuccino prah
it: Cappuccino in polvere
lt: Kapučino milteliai, greitai paruošiamas kapučino
nl: Cappucinopoeders, Cappucinopoeder
pl: Cappucino w proszku

en: Aromatised instant coffees
de: Aromatisierte Instant-Kaffees
es: Cafés instantáneos aromatizados
fr: Cafés instantanés aromatisés
hr: Aromatizirane instant kave
hu: Ízesített instant kávék
it: Caffè istantaneo aromatizzato
nl: Gearomatiseerde oploskoffies, Gearomatiseerde instantkoffies
ru: Ароматизированный растворимый кофе

en: Freeze-dried instant coffees
de: Gefriergetrocknete Instant-Kaffees
hr: Liofilizirane instant kave
nl: Gevriesdroogde oploskoffies, Gevriesdroogde oploskoffie
pl: Kawa liofilizowana
ru: Кофе растворимый сублимированный, Растворимый сублимированный кофе, Кофе сублимированный растворимый, Сублимированный растворимый кофе, Кофе натуральный растворимый сублимированный, Натуральный растворимый сублимированный кофе

en: Instant coffee substitutes
hu: Instant kávéhelyettesítők

en: Liquid chicory
fr: Chicorée liquide
hu: Folyékony cikória

en: Instant chicory, Instant chicory powder
fr: Chicorée soluble, chicorée en poudre, Chicorée en poudre soluble
hr: Instant cikorija
hu: Instant cikória
it: Cicoria solubile
nl: Oploscichorei
ru: Цикорий растворимый, растворимый цикорий

en: Instant mix of chicory and coffee powder
fr: Chicorée et café en poudre soluble

en: Sugar free ready-to-drink instant chicory with artificial sweeteners reconstituted with standard semi-skimmed milk
fr: Chicorée instantanée non sucrée prête à boire reconstituée avec du lait demi-écrémé standard

en: Instant chicory with water
de: Instant-Chicorée mit Wasser
es: Chicoria instantánea con agua
fr: Chicorée instantanée avec de l'eau
hr: Instant cikorija s vodom
hu: Instant cikória vízzel
it: Cicoria istantanea con acqua
nl: Oploscichorei met water

en: Mix of chicory and coffee instant without sugar ready-to-drink (reconstituted with standard semi-skimmed milk)
fr: Chicorée et café instantané non sucré prête à boire (reconstituée avec du lait demi-écrémé standard)

en: Cereals-based beverages
fr: Cafés de céréales
hr: Kafići sa žitaricama
hu: Gabonaitalok, Gabonaalapú italok
nl: Granenkoffies, Meergranenkoffies
pl: Kawa zbożowa, Kawy zbożowe

fr: Orge soluble
it: Orzo solubile
pt: Cevada solúvel

en: Instant mix of barley and coffee powder
fr: Orge et café en poudre soluble

en: Torrefacto coffees
de: Geröstete Kaffees, Gerösteter Kaffee
es: Cafés torrefactos
fr: Cafés torréfiés, Café torréifié
hr: Torrefacto kave
it: Caffè torrefatto
nl: Gebrande koffies, Gebrande koffie
pt: Cafés torrados

en: Waters, bottled waters, bottled water
bg: Вода
ca: Aigua envasada
cs: Voda
da: Vand
de: Wasser, Wässer
es: Aguas, aguas embotelladas, agua embotellada
fi: vedet
fr: Eaux, eau, eaux en bouteilles, eau en bouteille, Eau de source en bouteille, Eau de source embouteillée
he: סוגי מים
hr: vode, voda
hu: Vizek, Víz, Palackozott víz, Palackos víz, Üveges víz
it: Acque, acqua, acque in bottiglia, acqua in bottiglia
ja: 水
lt: Vanduo
nl: Waters, Water
pl: Woda
pt: Águas, águas engarrafadas, água engarrafada
ro: Apa
ru: Вода
sl: vode, voda
sv: Vatten
th: น้ำดื่ม
tr: Su
zh: 水

en: Municipal water, Tap water
da: Postevand
de: Leitungswasser
es: Agua municipal, Agua del grifo
fr: Eau du robinet
hr: Komunalne vode
hu: Vezetékes víz, Csapvíz
it: Acqua di rubinetto
ja: 水道水
nl: Kraanwaters
pt: Água da torneira
sv: Kranvatten

en: Ice Cubes
fr: Glaçons

en: Distilled waters
ar: ماء مقطر
az: Distillə olunmuş su
be: Дыстыляваная вада
bg: Дестилирана вода
ca: Aigua destil·lada
cs: Destilovaná voda
da: Destillerede vand, Destilleret vand
de: Destilliertes Wasser
el: Απεσταγμένο νερό
eo: Distilakvoj
es: Agua destilada
et: Destilleeritud vesi
eu: Ur destilatu
fa: آب مقطر
fi: Tislattu vesi
fr: Eaux distillées, Eau distillée
gl: Auga destilada
hi: आसुत जल
hr: Destilirana voda
hu: Desztillált víz
hy: Թորած ջուր
id: Air Suling
is: Eimað vatn
it: Acqua distillata
ja: 蒸留水
kk: Бидистиллят
ko: 증류수
lv: Destilēts ūdens
ms: Air suling
nb: Destillerte vann, Destillerte vatn, Destillert vann, Destillert vatn
nl: Gedestilleerd water
nn: Destillerte vatn, Destillert vatn
pl: Woda destylowana
pt: Água destilada
ro: Apă distilată
ru: Дистиллированная вода
sk: Destilovana voda
sl: Destilirana voda
sr: Дестилована вода
sv: Destillerade vatten, Destillerat vatten
ta: வாலைவடி நீர்
uk: Дистильована вода
uz: Distillangan suv
vi: Nước cất
zh: 蒸馏水

en: Drinking water
bg: Питейна вода
da: Drikkevand
de: Trinkwasser
fr: Eau potable
hr: Piti vodu
hu: Ívóvizek, Ivóvíz
it: Acqua potabile
ja: 飲料水
lt: Geriamasis vanduo
nl: Drinkwaters, Drinkwater
ru: Питьевая вода, вода питьевая
zh: 饮用水

en: Carbonated waters, Soda waters, Sparkling waters, Seltzer waters, Bottled mineral water carbonated
bg: Газирана вода
da: Danskvand
de: Selterswasser, Selterswässer, Sodawasser, Sodawässer, Sprudel, Sprudelwasser, Sprudelwässer
es: Aguas carbonatadas, Agua carbonatada
fi: hiilihapotetut vedet
fr: Eaux gazeuses, eau gazeuse, eaux pétillantes, eau pétillante
hr: Gazirane vode
hu: Szénsavas vizek, Szénsavas víz, Szódavíz
it: Acque frizzanti, acqua frizzante
ja: 炭酸水
lt: Gazuotas vanduo, Sodos vanduo, Seltzer vanduo
nl: Koolzuurhoudende waters, Koolzuurhoudend water
pl: Woda gazowana
pt: Águas com gás
ru: Газированная вода
sv: Kolsyrade vatten